District of Columbia statutes.
20-402

Supervised administration; procedure.

(a)

A prayer for supervised administration may be made in the petition for probate. The Court shall order supervised administration of a decedent’s estate only:

(1)

If the decedent’s will directs supervised administration;

(2)

If the decedent’s will directs unsupervised administration, but for good cause shown the Court finds that supervised administration is necessary for the protection of persons interested in the estate; or

(3)

In other cases where, for good cause shown, the Court finds that supervised administration is necessary under the circumstances which the Court shall specify.

(b)

In no event shall the appointment of a personal representative be delayed pending the Court’s decision pursuant to subsection (a) of this section. Thus, whenever the Court must make a decision under subsection (a)(2) or (a)(3) of this section, the Court shall appoint the personal representative in unsupervised administration; thereafter, an Order for supervised administration shall convert the proceeding to supervised administration.

Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-241, § 3(t), 42 DCR 63
This section is referenced in § 20-304, § 20-312, § 20-324, and § 20-403.
1981 Ed., § 20-402.
Application of Law 10-241: See Application of Law 10-241 and Emergency act amendment notes to § 20-401.